Wisconsin, session 2025, SB632.
do enact as follows:SB632,11Section 1. 46.03 (44) of the statutes is amended to read:SB632,2,10246.03 (44) Sexually transmitted disease treatment information. 3Prepare and keep current an information sheet to be distributed to a patient by a 4physician, physician assistant, or certified advanced practice nurse prescriber 5providing expedited partner therapy to that patient under s. 448.035 or, 448.9725, 6or 466.052. The information sheet shall include information about sexually 7transmitted diseases and their treatment and about the risk of drug allergies. The 8information sheet shall also include a statement advising a person with questions 9about the information to contact his or her physician, pharmacist, or local health 10department, as defined in s. 250.01 (4).SB632,211Section 2. 77.54 (14) (f) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:SB632,2,121277.54 (14) (f) 1m. A naturopathic doctor.SB632,313Section 3. 255.07 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB632,3,214255.07 (1) (d) “Health care practitioner” means a physician, a naturopathic 1doctor, a physician assistant, or an advanced practice nurse who is certified to issue 2prescription orders under s. 441.16.SB632,43Section 4. 450.11 (7) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB632,3,74450.11 (7) (b) Information communicated to a physician, naturopathic doctor, 5physician assistant, or advanced practice nurse prescriber in an effort to procure 6unlawfully a prescription drug or the administration of a prescription drug is not a 7privileged communication.SB632,58Section 5. 450.11 (8) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB632,3,109450.11 (8) (g) The naturopathic medicine examining board, insofar as this 10section applies to naturopathic doctors.SB632,611Section 6. 466.01 (6) (a) 4m. of the statutes is created to read:SB632,3,1312466.01 (6) (a) 4m. Prescribing, dispensing, and administering prescription 13drugs, subject to s. 961.397.SB632,714Section 7. 466.01 (9) and (10) of the statutes are created to read:SB632,3,1515466.01 (9) “Prescription drug” has the meaning given in s. 450.01 (20) (a).SB632,3,1616(10) “Prescription order” has the meaning given in s. 450.01 (21).SB632,817Section 8. 466.03 (2) (f) of the statutes is repealed.SB632,918Section 9. 466.04 (3) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB632,3,2019466.04 (3) (a) 4. Proof of compliance with any the applicable malpractice 20insurance requirements under s. 466.03 (2) (f) 466.05 (3).SB632,1021Section 10. 466.05 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB632,3,2222466.05 (title) Practice; malpractice insurance.SB632,1123Section 11. 466.05 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB632,4,21466.05 (1) (a) A naturopathic doctor may practice naturopathic medicine and 2may practice expedited partner therapy as provided in s. 466.052.SB632,123Section 12. 466.05 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB632,4,64466.05 (3) (a) Except as provided in par. (c), no naturopathic doctor may 5practice as provided in sub. (1) unless he or she has in effect malpractice liability 6insurance coverage evidenced by one of the following:SB632,4,871. Personal liability coverage in the amounts specified for health care 8providers in s. 655.23 (4).SB632,4,1092. Coverage under a group liability policy providing individual coverage for 10the naturopathic doctor in the amounts specified in s. 655.23 (4).SB632,4,1511(c) A naturopathic doctor who is a state, county, or municipal employee, or 12federal employee or contractor covered under the federal tort claims act, as 13amended, and who is acting within the scope of his or her employment or 14contractual duties is not required to maintain in effect malpractice liability 15insurance coverage.SB632,4,1916(d) Except as provided in par. (c), a naturopathic doctor is in compliance with 17par. (a) if the naturopathic doctor’s employer has in effect malpractice liability 18insurance coverage that is at least the minimum amount specified in s. 655.23 (4) 19and that provides coverage for claims against the naturopathic doctor.SB632,4,2020(e) This subsection does not apply to limited-scope naturopathic doctors.SB632,1321Section 13. 466.052 of the statutes is created to read:SB632,4,2222466.052 Expedited partner therapy. (1) In this section:SB632,4,2323(b) “Antimicrobial drug” has the meaning given in s. 448.035 (1) (b).SB632,4,2424(c) “Expedited partner therapy” has the meaning given in s. 448.035 (1) (c).SB632,5,101(2) A naturopathic doctor may provide expedited partner therapy if a patient 2is diagnosed as infected with a chlamydial infection, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis 3and the patient has had sexual contact with a sexual partner during which the 4chlamydial infection, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis may have been transmitted to or 5from the sexual partner. The naturopathic doctor shall attempt to obtain the name 6of the patient’s sexual partner. A prescription order for an antimicrobial drug 7prepared under this subsection shall include the name and address of the patient’s 8sexual partner, if known. If the naturopathic doctor is unable to obtain the name of 9the patient’s sexual partner, the prescription order shall include, in ordinary, bold-10faced capital letters, the words, “expedited partner therapy” or the letters “EPT.”SB632,5,1411(3) The naturopathic doctor shall provide the patient with a copy of the 12information sheet prepared by the department of health services under s. 46.03 (44) 13and shall request that the patient give the information sheet to the person with 14whom the patient had sexual contact.SB632,5,1815(4) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), a naturopathic doctor is immune from 16civil liability for injury to or the death of a person who takes any antimicrobial drug 17if the antimicrobial drug is prescribed, dispensed, or furnished under this section 18and if expedited partner therapy is provided as specified under this section.SB632,5,2119(b) The immunity under par. (a) does not extend to the donation, distribution, 20furnishing, or dispensing of an antimicrobial drug by a naturopathic doctor whose 21act or omission involves reckless, wanton, or intentional misconduct.SB632,1422Section 14. 466.07 (2) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:SB632,6,323466.07 (2) (h) Engaged in unprofessional or unethical conduct in violation of 1the code of ethics established in the rules promulgated under s. 466.03 (1) (a). In 2this paragraph, “unprofessional or unethical conduct” does not include providing 3expedited partner therapy as described in s. 466.052.SB632,154Section 15. 961.01 (19) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB632,6,105961.01 (19) (a) A physician, naturopathic doctor, advanced practice nurse, 6dentist, veterinarian, podiatrist, optometrist, scientific investigator or, subject to s. 7448.975 (1) (b), a physician assistant, or other person licensed, registered, certified 8or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, 9administer or use in teaching or chemical analysis a controlled substance in the 10course of professional practice or research in this state.SB632,1611Section 16. 961.23 (6) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb632 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb632 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB632 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB632 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB632: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting